Utah statutes.
31A-27a-116.   Financial reporting.

(1) (a)  The receiver shall comply with all requirements for receivership financial reporting as specified by the commissioner by rule within:

(i)  180 days after the day on which the receivership court enters an order of receivership; and

(ii)  45 days following each calendar quarter after the period specified in Subsection (1)(a)(i).

(b)  The rule described in this Subsection (1) shall:

(i)  comply with this section;

(ii)  be made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(iii)  require the receiver to file any financial report with the receivership court in addition to any other person specified in the rule.

(c)  A financial report shall include, at a minimum, a statement of:

(i)  the assets and liabilities of the insurer;

(ii)  the changes in those assets and liabilities; and

(iii)  all funds received or disbursed by the receiver during that reporting period.

(d)  The receiver may qualify a financial report or provide notes to the financial statement for further explanation.

(e)  The receivership court may order the receiver to provide any additional information as the receivership court considers appropriate.

(2)  Each affected guaranty association shall file one or more reports with the liquidator:

(a) (i)  within 180 days after the day on which the receivership court enters an order of liquidation; and

(ii) (A)  within 45 days following each calendar quarter after the period described in Subsection (2)(a)(i); or

(B)  at an interval:

(I)  agreed to between the liquidator and the affected guaranty association; or

(II)  required by the receivership court; and

(b)  in no event less than annually.

(3)  For good cause shown, the receivership court may grant:

(a)  relief for an extension or modification of time to comply with Subsection (1) or (2); or

(b)  such other relief as may be appropriate.

